North Carolina, session 2025, HB661.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. LOCAL DEVELOPMENT AND CONSTRUCTION REGULATION

PROHIBIT INSPECTION DEPARTMENTS FROM CHARGING FEES FOR CERTAIN
INSPECTION CANCELLATIONS
SECTION 1.1. G.S. 160D-1104 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d2) An inspection department shall not charge the permit holder a fee or fail an inspection
of a building or structure subject to the North Carolina Residential Code, if the permit holder
cancels a scheduled inspection more than one business day before the scheduled inspection."

LIMIT DESIGN METHODOLOGY AND CONSTRUCTION STANDARDS FOR
CERTAIN MUNICIPAL STREETS
SECTION 1.2.(a) Article 15 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-1502. Limit street design methodology and construction standards for certain
municipal streets.
Notwithstanding G.S. 136-66.4, municipalities shall not implement design methodology and
construction standards for new streets and highways to be accepted by a municipality, utilizing
funds that are not wholly municipal funds, that are more stringent than design methodology and
construction standards utilized by the North Carolina Department of Transportation. Nothing in
this section limits the authority of the North Carolina Department of Transportation to regulate
street connections to a public system as authorized by law."
SECTION 1.2.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to
projects initiated on or after that date.

LIMIT DESIGN METHODOLOGY AND CONSTRUCTION STANDARDS FOR
CERTAIN PRIVATE STREETS
SECTION 1.3.(a) Article 15 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-1503. Limit street design methodology and construction standards for certain
private streets.
*H661-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Municipalities shall not implement design methodology and construction standards for new
streets designated as private, and intended to remain privately owned after construction, that are
more stringent than design methodology and construction standards utilized by the North
Carolina Department of Transportation. Notwithstanding any design methodology and
construction standards implemented by the municipality, the municipality must accept
engineered street design methodology and construction standards that do not meet minimum
standards utilized by the North Carolina Department of Transportation if the engineered street
design methodology and construction standards are signed and sealed by a duly licensed
professional engineer, under Chapter 89C of the General Statutes, and meet vehicular traffic and
fire apparatus access requirements. If engineered street design methodology and construction
standards do not meet minimum standards utilized by the North Carolina Department of
Transportation, the developer must include disclosures to prospective buyers as outlined in
G.S. 136-102.6(f) prior to entering into any agreement or any conveyance with any prospective
buyer. A local government is discharged and released from any liabilities, duties, and
responsibilities imposed by this Chapter, or in common law, from any claim arising out of, or
attributed to, the plan review or acceptance of signed and sealed engineered street design
methodology and construction standards submitted pursuant to this section. Nothing in this
section limits the authority of local governments or the North Carolina Department of
Transportation to regulate private road, driveway, or street connection to a public system, or to
regulate transportation and utilities as otherwise authorized by law."
SECTION 1.3.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to
projects initiated on or after that date.

MUNICIPALITIES REQUIRING DEVELOPERS TO CONSTRUCT CERTAIN
PEDESTRIAN FACILITIES AND STREET IMPROVEMENTS TO ACCEPT THOSE
IMPROVEMENTS
SECTION 1.4.(a) Article 15 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-1504. Municipal requirements for pedestrian facilities and street improvements
within extraterritorial jurisdiction.
A municipality that requires a developer to construct a pedestrian facility or street
improvement within public right-of-way located outside of a construction project boundary shall
accept that pedestrian facility and street improvement into its municipal public road system for
maintenance and repair upon project completion. This section applies to projects located within
an extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality, established pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter
160D of the General Statutes. This section does not apply to public right-of-way that is under the
control of the North Carolina Department of Transportation."
SECTION 1.4.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to
projects initiated on or after that date.

COUNTIES REQUIRING DEVELOPERS TO CONSTRUCT CERTAIN PEDESTRIAN
AND STREET IMPROVEMENTS MUST SEEK AGREEMENTS TO ACCEPT THOSE
IMPROVEMENTS INTO A PUBLIC ROAD SYSTEM
SECTION 1.5.(a) Article 15 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-1505. County requirements for pedestrian facilities and public road
improvements.
A county shall not require a developer to construct a pedestrian facility or public road
improvement within public right-of-way located outside of a construction project boundary
unless the county obtains an agreement with either the North Carolina Department of
Transportation or the municipality, as applicable, that the pedestrian facility or public road
Page 2 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
improvement will be accepted into a public road system for maintenance and repair. This section
applies to projects located within a planning and development regulation jurisdiction of a county,
established pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes. This section does not
apply to public right-of-way that is under the control of the North Carolina Department of
Transportation."
SECTION 1.5.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to
projects initiated on or after that date.

AMEND PUBLIC STREET DEDICATION ABANDONMENT PROCESS
SECTION 1.6. G.S. 136-96 reads as rewritten:
"§ 136-96. Road or street not used within 15 years after dedication deemed abandoned;
declaration of withdrawal recorded; joint tenants or tenants in common; defunct
corporations.
(a) Every strip, piece, or parcel of land that has been at any time dedicated to public use
as a road, highway, street, avenue, or for any other purpose whatsoever, by a deed, grant, map,
plat, or other means, and that has not been actually opened and used by the public within 15 years
after its dedication is conclusively presumed to have been abandoned by the public for the
purposes for which it was dedicated; and no person shall have any right or cause of action
thereafter to enforce any public or private easement in the land.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, no abandonment of any public or
private right or easement shall be presumed until the dedicator or a person claiming under the
dedicator files or causes to be recorded in the register's office of the county where the land lies a
declaration withdrawing the strip, piece, or parcel of land from the public or private use to which
it was dedicated.
(c) When the fee simple title is vested in tenants in common or joint tenants of any land
embraced within the boundaries of a road, highway, street, avenue, or other land dedicated for
any public purpose whatsoever, as described in this section, any one or more of the cotenants, on
the cotenant's behalf and on behalf of the other cotenants, may execute and cause to be registered
in the office of the register of deeds of the county where the land is situated the declaration of
withdrawal provided for in this section. Under Chapter 46A (Partition) of the General Statutes
and Article 29A (Judicial Sales) of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes, and on petition of any one
or more of the cotenants, the land thereafter may be partitioned by sale only as between or among
the cotenants, irrespective of who may be in actual possession of the land. In the partition
proceeding, any cotenant may object to the withdrawal certificate and the court shall thereupon
order the certificate cancelled of record.
(d) When any corporation has dedicated any strip, piece, or parcel of land in the manner
set out in this section, and the dedicating corporation is no longer in existence, the corporation is
conclusively presumed to have no further right, title, or interest in the land, regardless of the
provisions of conveyances from the corporation, or those holding under the corporation, retaining
title and interest in the land. The right, title, and interest in the land is conclusively presumed to
be vested in those persons owning lots or parcels of land adjacent to it, subject to the provisions
of this section.
(e) This section does not apply in any of the following circumstances:
(1) When the continued use of any strip of land dedicated for street or highway
purposes is necessary to afford convenient ingress or egress to any lot or parcel
of land sold and conveyed by the dedicator of the street or highway.
(2) When the public dedication is part of a future street shown on the street plan
adopted pursuant to G.S. 136-66.2. Upon request, a city shall adopt a
resolution indicating that the dedication described in the proposed declaration
of withdrawal is or is not part of the street plan adopted under G.S. 136-66.2.
This resolution shall be attached to the declaration of withdrawal and shall be
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
registered in the office of the register of deeds of the county where the land is
situated.
(f) Any strip, piece, or parcel of land that was dedicated to public use as a local road,
highway, street, or avenue by plat on December 22, 1978, but that has not been maintained as a
local public road, highway, street, or avenue by a local governmental entity by January 1, 2025,
is hereby deemed withdrawn for public use, any rights of the public therein are deemed
abandoned, and no person or governmental entity shall have any right or cause of action to
enforce any public interest or easement in such land pursuant to this section."

PART II. NORTH CAROLINA STATE BUILDING CODE

EXEMPT MODEL HOMES FROM FIRE PROTECTION WATER SUPPLY
REQUIREMENT DURING CONSTRUCTION
SECTION 2.1.(a) Definitions. – For the purposes of this section, the following
definitions apply:
(1) Code. – The North Carolina State Building Code, and amendments to the
Code, as adopted by the Councils.
(2) Councils. – The Building Code Council and Residential Code Council.
(3) Model home. – As defined in G.S. 160D-1501(a).
(4) Water Supply Rules. – Section 3312.1, when required, of the North Carolina
Fire Code, and Section 3313.1, where required, of the North Carolina Building
Code.
SECTION 2.1.(b) Water Supply Rules. – Until the effective date of the rules to
amend Water Supply Rules, the Office of the State Fire Marshal, the Councils, and State and
local governments enforcing the Code shall implement Water Supply Rules as provided in
subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 2.1.(c) Implementation. – Notwithstanding Water Supply Rules, the fire
code official is authorized to reduce the fire-flow requirements for an isolated model home at a
subdivision project site where development of full-fire flow requirements is impractical or
pending.
SECTION 2.1.(d) Additional Rulemaking Authority. – The Council shall adopt rules
to amend Water Supply Rules to be consistent with subsection (c) of this section.
Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-19(4), the rule adopted by the Council pursuant to this section shall
be substantively identical to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this section are not subject to Part 3 of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General
Statutes. Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall become effective as provided in
G.S. 150B-21.3(b1) as though 10 or more written objections had been received as provided in
G.S. 150B-21.3(b2).
SECTION 2.1.(e) Additional Residential Code Council Rulemaking Authority. –
The Residential Code Council shall adopt rules to amend the 2024 North Carolina State Building
Code volumes specified within G.S. 143-138(a)(1) through (10) to make conforming changes to
codes applicable to residential construction consistent with rules adopted by the Building Code
Council as required by subsection (d) of this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection
are not subject to Part 3 of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection shall become effective as provided in G.S. 150B-21.3(b1) as though
10 or more written objections had been received as provided in G.S. 150B-21.3(b2).
SECTION 2.1.(f) Sunset. – This section expires when permanent rules adopted as
required by subsections (d) and (e) of this section become effective.

NORTH CAROLINA STATE BUILDING CODE VOLUME REFERENCE TECHNICAL
CORRECTIONS
Page 4 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.2.(a) G.S. 44A-11.1(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) With regard to any improvements to real property to which this Article is applicable
for which the costs of the undertaking are forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or more, either at the
time that the original building permit is issued or, in cases in which no building permit is required,
at the time the contract for the improvements is entered into with the owner, the owner shall
designate a lien agent no later than the time the owner first contracts with any person to improve
the real property. Provided, however, that the owner is not required to designate a lien agent for
improvements to an existing single-family residential dwelling unit as defined in G.S. 87-15.5(7)
that is occupied by the owner as a residence, or for the addition of an accessory building or
accessory structure as defined in the North Carolina Uniform Residential Building Code, the use
of which is incidental to that residence. The owner shall deliver written notice of designation to
its designated lien agent by any method authorized in G.S. 44A-11.2(f), and shall include in its
notice the street address, tax map lot and block number, reference to recorded instrument, or any
other description that reasonably identifies the real property for the improvements to which the
lien agent has been designated, and the owner's contact information. Designation of a lien agent
pursuant to this section does not make the lien agent an agent of the owner for purposes of
receiving a Claim of Lien on Real Property, a Notice of Claim of Lien upon Funds, a Notice of
Subcontract, or for any purpose other than the receipt of notices to the lien agent required under
G.S. 44A-11.2."
SECTION 2.2.(b) G.S. 58-45-5(5) reads as rewritten:
"(5) Insurable property. – Real property at fixed locations in the beach and coastal
area, including travel trailers when tied down at a fixed location, or the
tangible personal property located therein, but shall not include insurance on
motor vehicles; which property is determined by the Association, after
inspection and under the criteria specified in the plan of operation, to be in an
insurable condition. However, any one and two family dwellings built in
substantial accordance with the Federal Manufactured Home Construction
and Safety Standards, any predecessor or successor federal or State
construction or safety standards, and any further construction or safety
standards promulgated by the association and approved by the Commissioner,
or the North Carolina Uniform Residential Building Code and any structure
or building built in substantial compliance with the North Carolina State
Building Code, including the design-wind requirements, which is not
otherwise rendered uninsurable by reason of use or occupancy, shall be an
insurable risk within the meaning of this Article. However, none of the
following factors shall be considered in determining insurable condition:
neighborhood, area, location, environmental hazards beyond the control of the
applicant or owner of the property. Also, any structure begun on or after
January 1, 1970, not built in substantial compliance with the Federal
Manufactured Home Construction and Safety Standards, any predecessor or
successor federal or State construction or safety standards, and any further
construction or safety standards promulgated by the association and approved
by the Commissioner, or the North Carolina Uniform Residential Building
Code or the North Carolina State Building Code, including the design-wind
requirements therein, shall not be an insurable risk. The owner or applicant
shall furnish with the application proof in the form of a certificate from a local
building inspector, contractor, engineer or architect that the structure is built
in substantial accordance with the Federal Manufactured Home Construction
and Safety Standards, any predecessor or successor federal or State
construction or safety standards, and any further construction or safety
standards promulgated by the association and approved by the Commissioner,
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
or the North Carolina Uniform Residential Building Code or the North
Carolina State Building Code; however, an individual certificate shall not be
necessary where the structure is located within a political subdivision which
has certified to the Association on an annual basis that it is enforcing the North
Carolina Uniform Residential Building Code or the North Carolina State
Building Code and has no plans to discontinue enforcing these codes during
that year."
SECTION 2.2.(c) G.S. 87-10(b1) reads as rewritten:
"(b1) Public utilities contractors constructing house and building sewer lines as provided in
sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section shall, at the junction of the
public sewer line and the house or building sewer line, install as an extension of the public sewer
line a cleanout at or near the property line that terminates at or above the finished grade. Public
utilities contractors constructing water service lines as provided in sub-subdivision a. of
subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section shall terminate the water service lines at a valve,
box, or meter at which the facilities from the building may be connected. Public utilities
contractors constructing fire service mains for connection to fire sprinkler systems shall terminate
those lines at a flange, cap, plug, or valve inside the building one foot above the finished floor.
All fire service mains shall comply with the NFPA standards for fire service mains as
incorporated into and made applicable by Volume V of the North Carolina State Building Code."
SECTION 2.2.(d) G.S. 87-14(a1) reads as rewritten:
"(a1) Any person, firm, or corporation, upon making application to the building inspector
or other authority of any incorporated city, town, or county in North Carolina charged with the
duty of issuing building permits pursuant to G.S. 160D-1110 for any improvements for which
the combined cost is to be forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or more, other than for improvements
to an existing single-family residential dwelling unit as defined in G.S. 87-15.5(7) that the owner
occupies as a residence, or for the addition of an accessory building or accessory structure as
defined in the North Carolina Uniform Residential Building Code, the use of which is incidental
to that residential dwelling unit, shall be required to provide to the building inspector or other
authority the name, physical and mailing address, telephone number, facsimile number, and
email address of the lien agent designated by the owner pursuant to G.S. 44A-11.1(a)."
SECTION 2.2.(e) G.S. 87-21(c1) reads as rewritten:
"(c1) Exemption. – The provisions of this Article shall not apply to a person who performs
the on-site assembly of a factory designed drain line system for a manufactured home, as defined
in G.S. 143-143.9(6), if the person (i) is a licensed manufactured home retailer, a licensed
manufactured home set-up contractor, or a full-time employee of either, (ii) obtains an inspection
by the local inspections department and (iii) performs the assembly according to the State North
Carolina Plumbing Code."
SECTION 2.2.(f) G.S. 143-150 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-150. No electricity to be furnished units not in compliance.
It is unlawful for any person to furnish electricity for use in any manufactured home without
first ascertaining that the manufactured home and its electrical supply has been inspected
pursuant to G.S. 143-139 by the inspection authority having jurisdiction and found to comply
with the requirements of the State North Carolina Electrical Code. The certificate of compliance
issued by the inspection jurisdiction shall be accepted as evidence of compliance."
SECTION 2.2.(g) G.S. 160D-702(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) A zoning or other development regulation shall not do any of the following:
(1) Set a minimum square footage of any structures subject to regulation under
the North Carolina Residential Code.
(2) Require a parking space to be larger than 9 feet wide by 20 feet long unless
the parking space is designated for handicap, parallel, or diagonal parking.
Page 6 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Require additional fire apparatus access roads into developments of one- or
two-family dwellings that are not in compliance with the required number of
fire apparatus access roads into developments of one- or two-family dwellings
set forth in the Fire Code of the North Carolina Residential Code for One- and
Two-Family Dwellings.North Carolina Fire Code."
SECTION 2.2.(h) G.S. 160D-1117 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-1117. Periodic inspections.
The inspection department may make periodic inspections, subject to the governing board's
directions, for unsafe, unsanitary, or otherwise hazardous and unlawful conditions in buildings
or structures within its planning and development regulation jurisdiction. In exercising this
power, members of the department shall have a right to enter on any premises within the
jurisdiction of the department at all reasonable hours for the purposes of inspection or other
enforcement action, upon presentation of proper credentials. Inspections of dwellings shall
follow the provisions of G.S. 160D-1207. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit
periodic inspections in accordance with State fire prevention code the North Carolina Fire Code
or as otherwise required by State law."
SECTION 2.2.(i) G.S. 160D-1207(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the inspection department may
make periodic inspections only when there is reasonable cause to believe that unsafe, unsanitary,
or otherwise hazardous or unlawful conditions may exist in a residential building or structure.
However, when the inspection department determines that a safety hazard exists in one of the
dwelling units within a multifamily building, which in the opinion of the inspector poses an
immediate threat to the occupant, the inspection department may inspect, in the absence of a
specific complaint and actual knowledge of the unsafe condition, additional dwelling units in the
multifamily building to determine if that same safety hazard exists. For purposes of this section,
the term "reasonable cause" means any of the following: (i) the landlord or owner has a history
of more than two verified violations of the housing ordinances or codes within a 12-month period,
(ii) there has been a complaint that substandard conditions exist within the building or there has
been a request that the building be inspected, (iii) the inspection department has actual knowledge
of an unsafe condition within the building, or (iv) violations of the local ordinances or codes are
visible from the outside of the property. In conducting inspections authorized under this section,
the inspection department shall not discriminate between single-family and multifamily buildings
or between owner-occupied and tenant-occupied buildings. In exercising this power, members
of the department shall have a right to enter on any premises within the jurisdiction of the
department at all reasonable hours for the purposes of inspection or other enforcement action,
upon presentation of proper credentials. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit
periodic inspections in accordance with State fire prevention code the North Carolina Fire Code
or as otherwise required by State law."
SECTION 2.2.(j) G.S. 162A-900(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) A local government unit, as defined in G.S. 162A-201, shall not implement a scoring
or preference system to allocate water or sewer service among applicants for water or sewer
service for residential development that does any of the following:
(1) Includes consideration of building design elements, as defined in
G.S. 160D-702(b).
(2) Sets a minimum square footage of any structures subject to regulation under
the North Carolina Residential Code.
(3) Requires a parking space to be larger than 9 feet wide by 20 feet long unless
the parking space is designated for handicap, parallel, or diagonal parking.
(4) Requires additional fire apparatus access roads into developments of one- or
two-family dwellings that are not in compliance with the required number of
fire apparatus access roads into developments of one- or two-family dwellings
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
set forth in the Fire Code of the North Carolina Residential Code.North
Carolina Fire Code."

PART III. VARIOUS CONTRACTOR BOARDS

INCREASE CERTAIN PLUMBING AND HEATING CONTRACTOR BOARD
EXAMINATION AND LICENSE FEES
SECTION 3.1.(a) G.S. 87-22 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-22. License fee; expiration and renewal; reinstatement.
All persons, firms, or corporations engaged in the business of either plumbing or heating
contracting, or both, shall pay an annual license fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars
($150.00). three hundred dollars ($300.00). The annual fee for a piping or restricted classification
license shall not exceed that for a plumbing or heating license. All persons, firms, or corporations
engaged in the business of fire sprinkler contracting shall pay an initial application fee not to
exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00) and an annual license fee not to exceed three hundred dollars
($300.00). In the event the Board refuses to license an applicant, the license fee deposited shall
be returned by the Board to the applicant. All licenses shall expire on the last day of December
in each year following their issuance or renewal. Persons who obtain a license by passing an
examination on or after October 1 of any year may receive a license for the remainder of the year
by paying one-half of the usual license fee for that classification of license. It shall be the duty
of the secretary and treasurer to send by United States mail or e-mail to every licensee registered
with the Board, notice to the licensee's last known address reflected on the records of the Board
of the amount of fee required for renewal of license, the notice to be mailed at least one month
in advance of the expiration of the license. The Board may require payment of all unpaid annual
fees before reissuing a license. In the event of failure on the part of any person, firm or
corporation to renew the license certificate annually and pay the required fee during the month
of January in each year, the Board shall increase the license fee by twenty-five dollars ($25.00)
an amount not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) to cover any additional expense associated with
late renewal. The Board shall require reexamination upon failure of a licensee to renew license
within three years after expiration. The Board may adopt regulations requiring attendance at
programs of continuing education as a condition of license renewal. A licensee employed full
time as a local government plumbing, heating, or mechanical inspector and holding qualifications
from the Code Officials Qualifications Board may renew the license at a fee not to exceed
twenty-five dollars ($25.00)."
SECTION 3.1.(b) G.S. 87-22.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-22.1. Examination fees; funds disbursed upon warrant of chairman and
secretary-treasurer.
The Board shall charge a nonrefundable application and examination fee not to exceed one
hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each examination or any part
of an examination, and the funds collected shall be disbursed upon warrant of the chairman and
secretary-treasurer, to partially defray general expenses of the Board. The application and
examination fee shall be retained by the Board whether or not the applicant is granted a license.
Until changed by the Board pursuant to rules adopted by the Board, the fee for each examination
or any part taken on a particular day shall be one hundred dollars ($100.00)."
SECTION 3.1.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to
applications for examination and licensure received by the Board on or after that date.

LIMITED EXEMPTION FOR PLUMBING AND HEATING CONTRACTOR BOARD
INVESTIGATIVE RECORDS FROM PUBLIC RECORDS
SECTION 3.2. Article 2 of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
Page 8 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 87-22.3. Investigation records of the Board.
All records, papers, investigative files, investigative notes, reports, other investigative
information, and other documents containing information in the possession of or received,
gathered, or completed by the Board, its members, staff, employees, attorneys, or consultants as
a result of investigations, inquiries, assessments, or interviews conducted in connection with a
license application or disciplinary action initiated by the Board, shall not be considered public
records within the meaning of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Documents described in this
section are privileged, confidential, and not subject to discovery, subpoena, or other means of
legal compulsion for release to any person other than the Board or its employees or consultants.
If any record, paper, or other document containing information collected and compiled by or on
behalf of the Board is received and admitted in evidence in any hearing before the Board, the
documents shall be a public record within the meaning of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes."

INCREASE CERTAIN ELECTRICAL CONTRACTOR BOARD EXAMINATION AND
LICENSE FEES
SECTION 3.3.(a) G.S. 87-44 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-44. Fees; license term.
The Board shall collect a fee from each applicant before granting or renewing a license under
the provisions of this Article; the annual license fee for the limited classification shall not exceed
one hundred dollars ($100.00) one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) for each principal and each
branch place of business; the annual license fee for the intermediate classification shall not
exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each principal and
each branch place of business; the annual license fee for the unlimited classification shall not
exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for each principal and
each branch place of business; and the annual license fee for the special restricted classifications
and for the single-family detached residential dwelling license shall not exceed one hundred
dollars ($100.00) one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) for each principal and each branch place of
business.
The Board shall establish a system for the renewal of licenses with varying expiration dates.
However, all licenses issued by the Board shall expire one year after the date of issuance.
Licenses shall be renewed by the Board, subject to G.S. 87-44.1 and G.S. 87-47, after receipt and
evaluation of a renewal application from a licensee and the payment of the required fee. The
application shall be upon a form provided by the Board and shall require such information as the
Board may prescribe. Renewal applications and fees shall be due 30 days prior to the license
expiration date.
Upon failure to renew by the expiration date established by the Board, the license shall be
automatically revoked. This license may be reinstated by the Board, subject to G.S. 87-44.1 and
G.S. 87-47, upon payment of the license fee, an administrative fee of twenty-five dollars
($25.00), and all fees for the lapsed period during which the person, partnership, firm or
corporation engaged in electrical contracting, and, further, upon the satisfaction of such
experience requirements during the lapse as the Board may prescribe by rule.
The Board may collect fees from applicants for examinations in an amount not to exceed one
hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00), two hundred dollars ($200.00), except the fee for a
specially arranged examination shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00). In addition, the
Board may collect an examination review fee, not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00), from
failed examinees who apply for a supervised review of their failed examinations."
SECTION 3.3.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to
applications for examination and licensure received by the Board on or after that date.

LIMITED EXEMPTION FOR ELECTRICAL CONTRACTOR BOARD
INVESTIGATIVE RECORDS FROM PUBLIC RECORDS
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.4. Article 4 of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 87-47.1. Investigation records of the Board.
All records, papers, investigative files, investigative notes, reports, other investigative
information, and other documents containing information in the possession of or received,
gathered, or completed by the Board, its members, staff, employees, attorneys, or consultants as
a result of investigations, inquiries, assessments, or interviews conducted in connection with a
license application or disciplinary action initiated by the Board shall not be considered public
records within the meaning of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Documents described in this
section are privileged, confidential, and not subject to discovery, subpoena, or other means of
legal compulsion for release to any person other than the Board or its employees or consultants.
If any record, paper, or other document containing information collected and compiled by or on
behalf of the Board is received and admitted in evidence in any hearing before the Board, the
documents shall be a public record within the meaning of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes."

EXEMPT CERTAIN CONSTRUCTION TRADES FROM GENERAL CONTRACTOR
LICENSURE REQUIREMENTS AND RELATED BUILDING PERMIT EXEMPTIONS
SECTION 3.5.(a) G.S. 87-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-1. "General contractor" defined; exceptions.
(a) For the purpose of this Article any person or firm or corporation who for a fixed price,
commission, fee, or wage, undertakes to bid upon or to construct or who undertakes to
superintend or manage, on his the person's own behalf or for any person, firm, or corporation that
is not licensed as a general contractor pursuant to this Article, the construction of any building,
highway, public utilities, grading or any improvement or structure where the cost of the
undertaking is forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or more, or undertakes to erect a North Carolina
labeled manufactured modular building meeting the North Carolina State Building Code, shall
be deemed to be a "general contractor" engaged in the business of general contracting in the State
of North Carolina.
(b) This section shall not apply to the following:
(1) Persons, firms, or corporations furnishing or erecting industrial equipment,
power plan equipment, radial brick chimneys, and monuments.
(2) Any person, firm, or corporation who constructs or alters a building on land
owned by that person, firm, or corporation provided (i) the building is
intended solely for occupancy by that person and his family, firm, or
corporation after completion; and (ii) the person, firm, or corporation
complies with G.S. 87-14. If the building is not occupied solely by the person
and his that person's family, firm, or corporation for at least 12 months
following completion, it shall be presumed that the person, firm, or
corporation did not intend the building solely for occupancy by that person
and his that person's family, firm, or corporation.
(3) Any person engaged in the business of farming who constructs or alters a
building on land owned by that person and used in the business of farming,
when the building is intended for use by that person after completion.
(4) Any person engaged in the business of providing the following installation,
maintenance, or replacement services related to the construction or
improvement of a building or structure:
a. Floor covering services.
b. Painting services."
SECTION 3.5.(b) G.S. 160D-1110 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
Page 10 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(c1) A building permit is not required for installation, maintenance, or replacement
services described in G.S. 87-1(b)(4) in the construction or improvement of a building or
structure subject to the North Carolina Residential Code."
SECTION 3.5.(c) G.S. 143-138 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(b25) Permit Exclusion for Certain Services. – No permit shall be required under the Code
for installation, maintenance, or replacement services described in G.S. 87-1(b)(4) in the
construction or improvement of a building or structure subject to the North Carolina Residential
Code."
SECTION 3.5.(d) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

REMOVE BOARD FOR GENERAL CONTRACTORS REQUIREMENT TO CREDIT
THE NORTH CAROLINA ENGINEERING FOUNDATION
SECTION 3.6.(a) G.S. 87-7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-7. Records of Board; disposition of funds.
The secretary-treasurer shall keep a record of the proceedings of the said Board and shall
receive and account for all moneys derived from the operation of this Article. Any funds
remaining in the hands of the secretary-treasurer to the credit of the Board after the expenses of
the Board for the current year have been paid shall be paid over to the Greater University of
North Carolina for the use of the School of Engineering through the North Carolina Engineering
Foundation. The Board has the right, however, to retain at least ten percent (10%) of the total
expense it incurs for a year's operation to meet any emergency that may arise. As an expense of
the Board, said the Board is authorized to expend such funds as it deems necessary to provide
retirement and disability compensation for its employees."
SECTION 3.6.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

AMEND NORTH CAROLINA LICENSING BOARD FOR GENERAL CONTRACTORS
DISCIPLINARY ACTION AUTHORITY
SECTION 3.7.(a) G.S. 87-11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-11. Revocation of license; charges of fraud, negligence, incompetency, etc.;
Disciplinary action; hearing thereon; reissuance of certificate.procedures.
(a) The Board shall have the power to refuse to issue or renew or renew, revoke, suspend,
or restrict a certificate of license or to issue a reprimand or take other disciplinary action if a
general contractor licensed under this Article is found guilty of any licensee, qualifier, or
applicant:
(1) Employs the use of fraud or deceit misrepresentation in obtaining or
attempting to obtain or renew a license, or license.
(2) Commits an act of gross negligence, incompetency, or misconduct in the
practice of his or her profession, or willful violation of general contracting.
(3) Willfully violates any provision of this Article.Article, or any rules adopted
by the Board.
(4) Willfully violates any order of the Board.
(a1) The Board shall also have the power to revoke, suspend, or otherwise restrict the
ability of any person to act as a qualifying party for a license to practice general contracting, as
provided in G.S. 87-10(c), for any copartnership, corporation or any other organization or
combination, if that person committed any act in violation of the provisions of this section and
the Board may also take disciplinary action against the individual license held by that person.
(a1)(a2) Any person may prefer charges of fraud, deceit, negligence, or misconduct person,
including the Board on its own initiative, may submit a complaint against any general contractor
licensed licensee, qualifier, or applicant under this Article. The charges All complaints shall be
in writing and sworn affirmed to by the complainant and submitted to the Board. The Board shall
not accept complaints from an anonymous complainant. The Board is authorized to investigate
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
complaints alleging violations of this Article or any rule promulgated by the Board. The charges,
complaint, unless dismissed without hearing by the Board as unfounded or trivial, Board, shall
be heard and determined by the Board in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 150B of the
General Statutes.
(b) The Board shall adopt and publish guidelines, rules consistent with the provisions of
this Article, governing the suspension and revocation of licenses.Article.
(c) The Board shall establish and maintain a system whereby detailed records are kept
regarding complaints against each licensee. This record shall include, for each licensee, the date
and nature of each complaint, investigatory action taken by the Board, any findings by the Board,
and the disposition of the matter.
(d) The Board may reissue a license to any person, firm or corporation whose license has
been revoked: Provided, five or more members of the Board vote in favor of such reissuance for
reasons the Board may deem sufficient.
The Board shall immediately notify the Secretary of State of its findings in the case of the
revocation of a license or of the reissuance of a revoked license.
A certificate of license to replace any certificate lost, destroyed or mutilated may be issued
subject to the rules and regulations of the Board.
(e) The Board shall be entitled to recover its reasonable administrative costs associated
with the investigation and prosecution of a complaint alleging a violation of this Article or rules
or regulations of the Board up to a maximum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation for
any licensee or qualifying party licensee, qualifier, or applicant found to have committed any of
the following:violations enumerated in subdivisions (1) through (4) of subsection (a) of this
section.
(1) Fraud or deceit in obtaining a license.
(2) Gross negligence, incompetency, or misconduct in the practice of general
contracting.
(3) Willful violation of any provision of this Article."
SECTION 3.7.(b) G.S. 87-15.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-15.3. Identity of complaining party confidential.
Once a complaint has been filed with the Board against a licensee licensee, qualifier, or
applicant or an unlicensed general contractor, the Board may, in its discretion, keep the identity
of a complaining party confidential and not a public record within the meaning of Chapter 132
of the General Statutes until a time no later than the receipt of the complaint by the full Board
for a disciplinary hearing or injunctive action."
SECTION 3.7.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
actions filed or commenced on or after that date.

PROHIBIT GENERAL CONTRACTOR REEXAMINATION WHILE COURT
AWARDS REMAIN UNPAID
SECTION 3.8.(a) G.S. 87-13.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-13.1. Board may seek injunctive relief; attorney's fee.
(a) Whenever the Board determines that any person, firm or corporation has violated or
is violating any of the provisions of this Article or rules and regulations of the Board promulgated
under this Article, the Board may apply to the superior court for a restraining order and injunction
to restrain the violation; and the superior courts have jurisdiction to grant the requested relief,
irrespective of whether or not criminal prosecution has been instituted or administrative sanctions
imposed by reason of the violation.
(b) When the Board prevails in actions brought under this section, the court shall award
the Board its reasonable attorney's fee not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) fees plus the
costs associated with obtaining the relief and the investigation and prosecution of the violation.
Page 12 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Examination applicants who have failed to pay a court award pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section shall not be allowed to take any examination offered by the Board until the
award has been satisfied."
SECTION 3.8.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
actions filed or commenced on or after that date.

MODERNIZE GENERAL CONTRACTOR LAWS
SECTION 3.9. Article 1 of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Chapter 87.
"Contractors.
"Article 1.
"General Contractors.
…
"§ 87-2. Licensing Board; organization.
There is created the State Licensing Board for General Contractors consisting of nine
members appointed by the Governor for staggered five-year terms. Five of the members shall be
general contractors, one member shall be a registered engineer who practices structural
engineering, and three shall be public members. Of the general contractor members, one shall
have as the larger part of his the contractor's business the construction of highways; one shall
have as the larger part of his the contractor's business the construction of public utilities; one
shall have as the larger part of his the contractor's business the construction of buildings; and two
shall have as a larger part of their the contractor's businesses the construction of residences, one
of whom shall be the holder of an unlimited general contractor's license. The public members
shall have no ties with the construction industry and shall represent the interests of the public at
large. Members shall serve until the expiration of their respective terms and until their successors
are appointed and qualified. Vacancies occurring during a term shall be filled by appointment of
the Governor for the remainder of the unexpired term. The Governor may remove any member
of the Board for misconduct, incompetency, or neglect of duty. No Board member shall serve
more than two complete consecutive terms.
"§ 87-3. Members of Board to take oath.
Each member of the Board shall, before entering upon the discharge of the duties of his the
member's office, take and file with the Secretary of State an oath in writing to properly perform
the duties of his the member's office as a member of said the Board and to uphold the Constitution
of North Carolina and the Constitution of the United States.
"§ 87-4. First meeting of Board; officers; secretary-treasurer and assistants.
The said Board shall, within 30 days after its appointment by the Governor, meet in the City
of Raleigh, at a time and place to be designated by the Governor, and organize by electing a
chairman, a vice-chairman, chair, a vice-chair, and a secretary-treasurer, each to serve for one
year. Said The Board shall have power to make such bylaws, rules and regulations as it shall
deem best, provided the same are not in conflict with the laws of North Carolina. The
secretary-treasurer shall give bond in such sum as the Board shall determine, with such security
as shall be approved by the Board, said bond to be conditioned for the faithful performance of
the duties of his the secretary-treasurer's office and for the faithful accounting of all moneys and
other property as shall come into his hands. property of the Board. The secretary-treasurer need
not be a member of the Board, and the Board. The Board is hereby authorized to employ a
full-time secretary-treasurer, secretary-treasurer and such other assistants and make such other
expenditures as may be necessary to the proper carrying out of the provisions of this Article.
Payment of compensation and reimbursement of expenses of board members shall be governed
by G.S. 93B-5.
…
"§ 87-8. Records; roster of licensed contractors; report to Governor.
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The secretary-treasurer shall keep a record of the proceedings of the Board and a register of
all applicants for license showing for each the date of application, name, qualifications, place of
business, place of residence, and whether license was granted or refused. The books and register
of this the Board shall be prima facie evidence of all matters recorded therein. A roster showing
the names and places of business and of residence of all licensed general contractors shall be
prepared by the secretary of the Board during the month of March of each year; the roster shall
be printed by the Board out of funds of the Board as provided in G.S. 87-7, with copies being
made available to contractors and members of the public, at cost, upon request, or furnished
without cost, as directed by the Board. On or before the last day of March of each year the Board
shall submit to the Governor a report of its transactions for the preceding year, and shall file with
the Secretary of State a copy of the report, together with a complete statement of the receipts and
expenditures of the Board, attested by the affidavits of the chairman and the secretary, and a copy
of the roster of licensed general contractors.
"§ 87-9. Compliance with Federal Highway Act, etc.; contracts financed by federal road
funds; contracts concerning water or waste water systems.
Nothing in this Article shall operate to prevent the Department of Transportation from
complying with any act of Congress and any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto
for carrying out the provisions of the Federal Highway Act, or shall apply to any person, firm or
corporation proposing to submit a bid or enter into contract for any work to be financed in whole
or in part with federal aid road funds in such a manner as that will conflict with any act of
Congress or any such rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.
Neither shall anything in this Article prevent the State of North Carolina or any of its political
subdivisions or their contractors from complying with any act of Congress and any rules and
regulations promulgated pursuant thereto for carrying out the provisions of any federal program
to assist in the planning, financing, or construction of drinking water or waste water processing,
collection, and disposal systems and facilities.
…
"§ 87-10. Application for license; examination; certificate; renewal.
…
(c) If an applicant is an individual, examination may be taken by his the applicant's
personal appearance for examination, or by the appearance for examination of one or more of his
the applicant's responsible managing employees. If an applicant is a copartnership, a corporation,
or any other combination or organization, the examination may be taken by one or more of the
responsible managing officers or members of the personnel of the applicant.
…
"§ 87-10.1. Licensing of nonresidents.
…
(d) Delinquents. – If the Secretary of Revenue determines that any nonresident individual
or foreign corporation licensed by the board, Board, a member of any foreign limited liability
company licensed by the Board, or a partner in any foreign partnership licensed by the Board,
owes a delinquent income tax debt, the Secretary of Revenue may notify the Board of these
nonresident individuals and foreign entities and instruct the Board not to renew their certificates
of license. The Board shall not renew the certificate of license of such a nonresident individual
or foreign entity identified by the Secretary of Revenue unless the Board receives a written
statement from the Secretary that the debt either has been paid or is being paid pursuant to an
installment agreement.
"§ 87-10.2. Continuing education.
…
(g) Continuing education requirements shall begin on January 1 of any calendar year and
shall be completed by November 30 of that calendar year. The Board shall establish a 90-day
grace period following November 30 of each calendar year for any qualifier or qualifying party
Page 14 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
who has failed to complete the continuing education requirement. Failure of the qualifier or
qualifying party of the entity holding a building contractor, residential contractor, or unclassified
contractor license classification to satisfy the annual continuing education requirement by the
expiration of the grace period shall result in the license of the entity being invalidated until such
the time that continuing education and all other licensing requirements have been met.
…
"§ 87-12. Certificate evidence of license.
The issuance of a certificate of license or limited license by this Board shall be evidence that
the person, firm, or corporation named therein is entitled to all the rights and privileges of a
licensed or limited licensed general contractor while said license remains unrevoked or
unexpired. A licensed general contractor holding a license which qualifies him the contractor for
work as described in G.S. 87-10 shall be authorized to perform the said work without any
additional occupational license, notwithstanding the provisions of any other occupational
licensing statute. A license issued by any other occupational licensing board having jurisdiction
over any work described in G.S. 87-10 shall qualify such the licensee to perform the work for
which the license qualifies him without obtaining the license from the General Contractors
Licensing Board. Nothing contained herein shall operate to relieve any general contractor from
the necessity of compliance with other provisions of the law requiring building permits and
construction in accordance with appropriate provisions of the North Carolina State Building
Code.
"§ 87-13. Unauthorized practice of contracting; impersonating contractor; false certificate;
giving false evidence to Board; penalties.
Any person, firm, or corporation not being duly authorized who shall contract for or bid upon
the construction of any of the projects or works enumerated in G.S. 87-1, without having first
complied with the provisions hereof, or who shall attempt to practice general contracting in the
State, except as provided for in this Article, and any person, firm, or corporation presenting or
attempting to file as his their own the licensed certificate of another or who shall give false or
forged evidence of any kind to the Board or to any member thereof in maintaining a certificate
of license or who falsely shall impersonate another or who shall use an expired or revoked
certificate of license, or who falsely claims or suggests in connection with any business activities
regulated by the Board that a person, firm, or corporation is licensed under this Chapter, and any
architect or engineer who recommends to any project owner the award of a contract to anyone
not properly licensed under this Article, shall be deemed guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. And
the Board may, in its discretion, use its funds to defray the expense, legal or otherwise, in the
prosecution of any violations of this Article. No architect or engineer shall be guilty of a violation
of this section if his recommendation either of their recommendations to award a contract is made
in reliance upon current written information received by him the architect or engineer from the
appropriate Contractor Licensing Board of this the State which information erroneously indicates
that the contractor being recommended for contract award is properly licensed.
…
"§ 87-15. Copy of Article included in specifications; bid not considered unless contractor
licensed.
All architects and engineers preparing plans and specifications for work to be contracted in
the State of North Carolina shall include in their invitations to bidders and in their specifications
a copy of this Article or such portions thereof as are deemed necessary to convey to the invited
bidder, whether he the bidder be a resident or nonresident of this State and whether a license has
been issued to him the bidder or not, the information that it will be necessary for him the bidder
to show evidence of a license before his the bidder's bid is considered.
"§ 87-15.1. Reciprocity of licensing.
To the extent that other states which provide for the licensing of general contractors provide
for similar action, the Board in its discretion may grant licenses of the same or equivalent
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
classification to general contractors licensed by other states, without written examination upon
satisfactory proof furnished to the Board that the qualifications of such applicants are equal to
the qualifications of holders of similar licenses in North Carolina and upon payment of the
required fee.
…."

PART IV. AUTHORIZE CODE ENFORCEMENT QUALIFICATION BOARD TO
CERTIFY RESIDENTIAL CHANGEOUT SPECIAL INSPECTORS AND CREATE A
RESIDENTIAL CHANGEOUT ALTERNATE INSPECTION METHOD
SECTION 4.1.(a) Article 9C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, as amended by
S.L. 2024-49 and S.L. 2024-53, reads as rewritten:
"Article 9C.
"North Carolina Code Officials Enforcement Qualification Board.
"§ 143-151.8. Definitions.
(a) The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Board. – The North Carolina Code Officials Enforcement Qualification
Board.
(2) Code. – Consists of all of the following:
a. The North Carolina State Building Code adopted by the Building Code
Council and Residential Code Council under G.S. 143-138.
b. Local building rules approved by the Building Code Council and
Residential Code Council.
c. Any resolution adopted by a federally recognized Indian Tribe in
which the Tribe adopts the North Carolina State Building Code and
related local building rules.
d. The standards adopted by the State Fire Marshal under
G.S. 143-143.15(a).
(3) Code enforcement. – The examination and approval of plans and
specifications, the inspection of the manner of construction, workmanship,
and materials for construction of buildings and structures and their
components, or the enforcement of fire code regulations by any of the
following, to assure compliance with the North Carolina State Building Code
and related local building rules:Code:
a. An employee of the State or local government, except an employee of
the State Department of Labor engaged in the administration and
enforcement of sections of the Code that pertain to boilers and
elevators.
b. An employee of a federally recognized Indian Tribe employed to
perform inspections on tribal lands.
c. An individual contracting with the State, a local government, or a
federally recognized Indian Tribe to perform inspections on tribal
lands.
d. An individual who is employed by a company contracting with a
county or a city to conduct inspections.
e. A person who is contracting with a local government to perform
third-party plan review under G.S. 160D-1110.1(d).
f. A person who is contracting with a permit applicant to perform
third-party plan review under G.S. 160D-1110.1(e).
g. A person who is conducting residential changeout special inspections
under G.S. 160D-1106.1.
Page 16 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Local inspection department. – The agency or agencies of local government,
or any government agency of a federally recognized Indian Tribe, with
authority to make inspections of buildings and to enforce the Code and other
laws, ordinances, and rules enacted by the State, a local government, or a
federally recognized Indian Tribe.
(5) Qualified Code-enforcement official. – A person qualified certified under this
Article to engage in the practice of Code enforcement.enforcement who is also
employed by a local inspection department.
(b) For purposes of this Article, the population of a city or county is determined according
to the most current federal census, unless otherwise specified.
(c) For purposes of this Article, "willful misconduct, gross negligence, or gross
incompetence" in addition to the meaning of those terms under other provisions of the General
Statutes or at common law, includes any of the following:
(1) Enforcing a Code requirement in areas or circumstances not specified in the
requirement.
(2) Refusing to accept an alternative design or construction method that has been
appealed under G.S. 143-140.1 and found by the Office of the State Fire
Marshal to comply with the Code under the conditions or circumstances set
forth in the Office of the State Fire Marshal's decision for that appeal.
(3) Refusing to allow an alternative construction method currently included in the
Building Code under the conditions or circumstances set forth in the Code for
that alternative method.
(4) Enforcing a requirement that is more stringent than or otherwise exceeds the
Code requirement.
(5) Refusing to implement or adhere to an interpretation of the North Carolina
State Building Code issued by the Building Code Council, Residential Code
Council, or the Office of the State Fire Marshal.
(6) Habitually failing to provide requested inspections in a timely manner.
(7) Enforcing a Code official's preference in the method or manner of installation
of heating ventilation and air-conditioning units, appliances, or equipment if
it is not required by the State Building Code and is in contradiction of a
manufacturer's installation instructions or specifications.
"§ 143-151.9. North Carolina Code Officials Enforcement Qualification Board established;
members; terms; vacancies.
(a) There is hereby established the North Carolina Code Officials Enforcement
Qualification Board in the Department of Insurance. The Board shall be composed of 20
members appointed as follows:
(1) One member who is a city or county manager;manager.
(2) Two members, one of whom is an elected official representing a city over
5,000 population and one of whom is an elected official representing a city
under 5,000 population;population.
(3) Two members, one of whom is an elected official representing a county over
40,000 population and one of whom is an elected official representing a
county under 40,000 population;population.
(4) Two members serving as building officials Code-enforcement officials with
the responsibility for administering building, plumbing, electrical and heating
codes, one of whom serves a county and one of whom serves a city;city.
(5) One member who is a registered architect;architect.
(6) One member who is a registered engineer;engineer.
(7) Two members who are licensed general contractors, at least one of whom
specializes in residential construction;construction.
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) One member who is a licensed electrical contractor;contractor.
(9) One member who is a licensed plumbing or heating contractor;contractor.
(10) One member selected from the faculty of the North Carolina State University
School of Engineering and one member selected from the faculty of the
School of Engineering of the North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State
University;University.
(11) One member selected from the faculty of the School of Government at the
University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill;Hill.
(12) One member selected from the Community Colleges System Office;Office.
(13) One member selected from the Division of Engineering and Building Codes
in the Department of Insurance; and,Insurance.
(14) One member who is a local government fire prevention inspector and one
member who is a citizen of the State.
The various categories shall be appointed as follows: (1), (2), (3), and (14) by the Governor;
(4), (5), and (6) by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore
in accordance with G.S. 120-121; (7), (8), and (9) by the General Assembly upon the
recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives in accordance with
G.S. 120-121; (10) by the deans of the respective schools of engineering of the named
universities; (11) by the Dean of the School of Government at the University of North Carolina
at Chapel Hill; (12) by the President of the Community Colleges System; and (13) by the State
Fire Marshal.
(b) The members shall be appointed for staggered terms and the initial appointments shall
be made prior to September 1, 1977, and the appointees shall hold office until July 1 of the year
in which their respective terms expire and until their successors are appointed and qualified as
provided hereafter:
For the terms of one year: the members from subdivisions (1), (6) and (10) of subsection (a),
and one member from subdivision (3).
For the terms of two years: the member from subdivision (11) of subsection (a), one member
from subdivision (2), one member from subdivision (4), one member from subdivision (7), and
one member from subdivision (14).
For the terms of three years: the members from subdivisions (8) and (12) of subsection (a),
one member from subdivision (2), one member from subdivision (4), and one member from
subdivision (14).
For the terms of four years: the members from subdivision (5), (9) and (13) of subsection (a),
one member from subdivision (3), and one member from subdivision (7).
Thereafter, as the term of each member expires, his the member's successor shall be appointed
for a term of four years. Notwithstanding the appointments for a term of years, each member
shall serve at the will of the Governor.
Members of the Board who are public officers shall serve ex officio and shall perform their
duties on the Board in addition to the duties of their office.
(c) Vacancies in the Board occurring for any reason shall be filled for the unexpired term
by the person making the appointment.
"§ 143-151.10. Compensation.
Members of the Board who are State officers or employees shall receive no salary for serving
on the Board, but shall be reimbursed for their expenses in accordance with G.S. 138-6. Members
of the Board who are full-time salaried public officers or employees other than State officers or
employees shall receive no salary for serving on the Board, but shall be reimbursed for
subsistence and travel expenses in accordance with G.S. 138-5(a)(2) and (3). All other members
of the Board shall receive compensation and reimbursement for expenses in accordance with
G.S. 138-5(a).
Page 18 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 143-151.11. Chairman; vice-chairman; Chair; vice-chair; other officers; meetings;
reports.
(a) The members of the Board shall select one of their members as chairman chair upon
its creation, and shall select the chairman chair each July 1 thereafter.
(b) The Board shall select a vice-chairman vice-chair and such other officers and
committee chairmen chair from among its members, as it deems desirable, at the first regular
meeting of the Board after its creation and at the first regular meeting after July 1 of each year
thereafter. Provided, nothing in this subsection shall prevent the creation or abolition of
committees or offices of the Board, other than the office of vice-chairman, vice-chair, as the need
may arise at any time during the year.
(c) The Board shall hold at least four regular meetings per year upon the call of the
chairman. chair. Special meetings shall be held upon the call of the chairman chair or the
vice-chairman, vice-chair, or upon the written request of four members of the Board.
(d) The activities and recommendations of the Board with respect to standards for Code
officials the training and certification of persons engaged in the practice of Code enforcement
shall be set forth in regular and special reports made by the Board. Additionally, the Board shall
present special reports and recommendations to the Governor or the General Assembly, or both,
as the need may arise or as the Governor or the General Assembly may request.
"§ 143-151.12. Powers.
In addition to powers conferred upon the Board elsewhere in this Article, the Board has the
power to do the following:
(1) Adopt rules necessary to administer this Article.
(1a) Require State agencies, local inspection departments, and local governing
bodies to submit reports and information about the employment, education,
and training of Code-enforcement officials.
(2) Establish minimum standards for employment as a Code-enforcement official:
(i) in probationary or temporary status, and (ii) in permanent positions.
(3) Certify persons as being qualified under the provisions of this Article to be
Code-enforcement officials, including persons employed by a federally
recognized Indian Tribe to perform inspections on tribal lands.
(3a) Certify persons as being qualified under the provisions of this Article to be
North Carolina State Building Code Permit Technicians.
(3b) Certify persons as being qualified under the provisions of this Article to be
residential changeout special inspectors.
(4) Consult and cooperate with counties, municipalities, agencies of this State,
other governmental agencies, and with universities, colleges, junior colleges,
community colleges and other institutions concerning the development of
Code-enforcement training schools and programs or courses of instruction.
(5) Establish minimum standards and levels of education or equivalent experience
for all Code-enforcement instructors, teachers or professors.
(6) Conduct and encourage research by public and private agencies that shall be
designed to improve education and training in the administration of Code
enforcement.
(7) Adopt and amend bylaws, consistent with law, for its internal management
and control; appoint advisory committees as necessary; and enter into
contracts and do other things as necessary and incidental to the exercise of its
authority pursuant to this Article.
(8) Make recommendations concerning any matters within its purview pursuant
to this Article.
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 19

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(9) Establish within the Office of the State Fire Marshal a marketplace pool of
qualified certified Code-enforcement officials available for the following
purposes:
a. When requested by the State Fire Marshal, to assist in the discharge of
the State Fire Marshal's duty under G.S. 143-139 to supervise,
administer, and enforce the North Carolina State Building Code. The
State Fire Marshal shall have the power and authority to fix and collect
reasonable fees for services performed by Code-enforcement officials
under this sub-subdivision. The State Fire Marshal may also collect
reimbursement, at the rate established under G.S. 138-6, for mileage
costs incurred by Code-enforcement officials going to and from
inspections conducted under this sub-subdivision. The State Fire
Marshal shall have no power or authority to fix or collect fees incurred
by local inspection departments under sub-subdivision b. of this
subdivision.
b. When requested by local inspection departments, to assist in Code
enforcement.
"§ 143-151.13. Required standards and certificates for Code-enforcement
officials.certificates.
(a) No person shall engage in Code enforcement under this Article unless that person
possesses one of the following types of certificates, currently valid, issued by the Board attesting
to that person's qualifications to engage in Code enforcement: (i) a standard certificate; (ii) a
limited certificate provided for in subsection (c) of this section; or (iii) a probationary certificate
provided for in subsection (d) of this section. To obtain a standard certificate, a person must pass
an examination, as prescribed by the Board or by a contracting party under G.S. 143-151.16(d),
that is based on the North Carolina State Building Code and administrative procedures required
for Code enforcement. The Board may issue a standard certificate of qualification to each person
who successfully completes the examination. The certificate authorizes that person to engage in
the practice of Code enforcement and to practice as a qualified Code-enforcement official in
North Carolina. The certificate of qualification shall bear the signatures of the chairman chair
and secretary of the Board.
(b) The Board shall issue one or more standard certificates to each person seeking to
practice Code enforcement as a certified Code-enforcement official by demonstrating the
qualifications set forth in subsection (b1) (b2) of this section. Standard certificates are available
for each of the following types of qualified for Code-enforcement officials:
(1) Building inspector.
(2) Electrical inspector.
(3) Mechanical inspector.
(4) Plumbing inspector.
(5) Fire inspector.
(6) Residential changeout inspector.
(b1) The Board shall issue a standard certificate to each person seeking to practice Code
enforcement as a residential changeout special inspector by demonstrating the qualifications set
forth in subsection (b2) of this section.
(b1)(b2) The holder of a standard certificate may practice Code enforcement only within
the inspection area and level described upon the certificate issued by the Board. A
Code-enforcement official holder of a standard certificate may qualify and hold one or more
certificates. These certificates may be for different levels in different types of positions as defined
in this section and in rules adopted by the Board.
(b2)(b3) A Code-enforcement official holding a certificate indicating a specified level of
proficiency in a particular type of position may hold a position calling for that type of
Page 20 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
qualification anywhere in the State. With respect to all types of Code-enforcement officials, those
with Level I, Level II, or Level III certificates shall be qualified to inspect and approve only those
types and sizes of buildings as specified in rules adopted by the Board.
(c) A Code-enforcement official holding office as of the date specified in this subsection
for the county or municipality by which he is employed, shall not be required to possess a
standard certificate as a condition of tenure or continued employment but shall be required to
complete such in-service training as may be prescribed by the Board. At the earliest practicable
date, such official shall receive from the Board a limited certificate qualifying him to engage in
Code enforcement at the level, in the particular type of position, and within the governmental
jurisdiction in which he the Code-enforcement official is employed. The limited certificate shall
be valid only as an authorization for the Code-enforcement official to continue in the position he
held on the applicable date and shall become invalid if he the Code-enforcement official does not
complete in-service training within two years following the applicable date in the schedule below,
according to the governmental jurisdiction's population as published in the 1970 U.S. Census:
Counties and Municipalities over 75,000 population – July 1, 1979
Counties and Municipalities between 50,001 and 75,000 – July 1, 1981
Counties and Municipalities between 25,001 and 50,000 – July 1, 1983
Counties and Municipalities 25,000 and under – July 1, 1985
All fire prevention inspectors holding office – July 1, 1989. Fire prevention inspectors have
until July 1, 1993, to complete in-service training.
An A Code-enforcement official holding a limited certificate can be promoted to a position
requiring a higher level certificate only upon issuance by the Board of a standard certificate or
probationary certificate appropriate for such new position.
(d) The Board may provide for the issuance of probationary or temporary certificates
valid for such period (not less than one year nor more than three years) as specified by the Board's
rules, or until June 30, 1983, whichever is later, to any Code-enforcement official newly
employed or newly promoted person seeking to practice Code enforcement who lacks the
qualifications prescribed by the Board as prerequisite to applying for a standard certificate under
subsection (a). No Code-enforcement official may have a probationary or temporary certificate
extended beyond the specified period by renewal or otherwise.
(d1) The Board may provide for appropriate levels of probationary or temporary
certificates and may issue these certificates with such special conditions or requirements relating
to the place of employment of the person holding the certificate, his supervision on a consulting
or advisory basis, or other matters as the Board may deem necessary to protect the public safety
and health.
(e) The Board shall, without requiring an examination, issue a standard certificate to any
person who is currently certified as a county electrical inspector pursuant to G.S. 160D-1102.
The certificate issued by the Board shall authorize the person to serve at the electrical inspector
level approved by the State Fire Marshal in G.S. 160D-1102.
(f) The Board shall issue a standard certificate to any person who is currently licensed to
practice as a(n):any of the following:
(1) Architect, registered pursuant to Chapter 83A;83A.
(2) General contractor, licensed pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 87;87.
(3) Plumbing or heating contractor, licensed pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter
87;87.
(4) Electrical contractor, licensed pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 87; or,87.
(5) Professional engineer, registered pursuant to Chapter 89C;89C.
provided the person successfully completes a short course, as prescribed by the Board,
relating to the North Carolina State Building Code regulations and Code enforcement
administration. The standard certificate shall authorize the person to practice as a qualified Code
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 21

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
enforcement official in a particular type of position at the level determined by the Board, based
on the type of license or registration held in any profession specified above.
(g) A licensed architect or licensed professional engineer who possesses a valid
certificate under subsection (f) of this section, but is not employed by the State or a local
government, may utilize that certificate for the limited purpose of performing independent
third-party plan review under subsections (d) and (e) of G.S. 160D-1110.1.
"§ 143-151.13A. Professional development program for officials.program.
(a) As used in this section, "official" means a qualified Code-enforcement official as that
term is defined in G.S. 143-151.8.
(b) The Board may establish professional development requirements for officials
certificate holders as a condition of the renewal or reactivation of their certificates. The purposes
of these professional development requirements are to assist officials certificate holders in
maintaining professional competence in their enforcement of the Code and to assure the health,
safety, and welfare of the citizens of North Carolina. An official A certificate holder subject to
this section shall present evidence to the Board at each certificate renewal after initial
certification, that during the 12 months before the certificate expiration date, the official
certificate holder has completed the required number of credit hours in courses approved by the
Board. Annual continuing education hour requirements shall be determined by the Board but
shall not be more than six credit hours.
(c) The Board may require an individual who earns a certificate under programs
established in G.S. 143-151.13 to complete professional development courses, not to exceed six
hours in each technical area of certification, within one year after that individual is first employed
by a city or county inspection department.local inspection department as a Code-enforcement
official.
(d) As a condition of reactivating a standard or limited certificate, the Board may require
the completion of professional development courses within one year after reemployment as an a
Code-enforcement official as follows:
(1) An individual who has been on inactive status for more than two years and
who has not been continuously employed by a city or county inspection
department during the period of inactive status shall complete professional
development courses not to exceed six hours for each technical area in which
the individual is certified.
(2) An individual who has been on inactive status for more than two years and
who has been continuously employed by a city or county inspection
department during the period of inactive status shall complete professional
development courses not to exceed three hours for each technical area in
which the individual is certified.
(3) An individual who has been on inactive status for two years or less shall
complete professional development courses not to exceed two hours for each
technical area in which the individual is certified.
(e) The Board may, for good cause shown, grant extensions of time to officials certificate
holders to comply with these requirements. An official A certificate holder who, after obtaining
an extension under this subsection, offers evidence satisfactory to the Board that the official
certificate holder has satisfactorily completed the required professional development courses, is
in compliance with this section.
(f) The Board may adopt rules to implement this section, including rules that govern:
(1) The content and subject matter of professional development courses.
(2) The criteria, standards, and procedures for the approval of courses, course
sponsors, and course instructors.
(3) The methods of instruction.
(4) The computation of course credit.
Page 22 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) The ability to carry-forward course credit from one year to another.
(6) The waiver of or variance from the professional development required for
hardship or other reasons.
(7) The procedures for compliance and sanctions for noncompliance.
"§ 143-151.14. Comity.
(a) The Board may, without requiring an examination, grant a standard certificate as a
qualified Code-enforcement official to a person seeking to engage in the practice of Code
enforcement for a particular type of position and level to any person who, at the time of
application, is certified as a qualified Code-enforcement official holds a certificate in good
standing issued by a similar board of another state, district or territory where standards are
acceptable to the Board and not lower than those required by this Article for a similar type of
position and level in this State.
(b) The Board may, without requiring an examination, grant a standard certificate as a
qualified Code-enforcement official for a particular type of position and level to any person who,
at the time of application, is certified as a qualified Code-enforcement official in good standing
by by, and in good standing with, the International Code Council where standards and
examination are acceptable to the Board and not lower than those required by this Article for a
type of position and level in this State.
(c) The certificates granted under subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall expire after
three years unless within that time period the holder completes a short course, as prescribed by
the Board, relating to the North Carolina State Building Code regulations and Code-enforcement
Code enforcement administration.
(d) A fee of not more than twenty dollars ($20.00), as determined by the Board, must be
paid by any applicant to the Board for the issuance of a certificate under this section. The
provisions of G.S. 143-151.16(b) relating to renewal fees and late renewals shall apply to every
person granted a standard certificate in accordance with this section.
"§ 143-151.15. Return of certificate to Board; reissuance by Board.
(a) A certificate issued by the Board under this Article to a Code-enforcement official is
valid as long as the person certified is employed by the State of North Carolina or any political
subdivision thereof as a Code-enforcement official, or is employed by a federally recognized
Indian Tribe to perform inspections on tribal lands as a Code-enforcement official. When the
person certified leaves that employment for any reason, he that person shall return the certificate
to the Board. If the person subsequently obtains employment as a Code-enforcement official in
any governmental jurisdiction described above, the Board may reissue the certificate to him.
certificate. The provisions of G.S. 143-151.16(b) relating to renewal fees and late renewals shall
apply, if appropriate. The provisions of G.S. 143-151.16(c) shall not apply. This section does not
affect the Board's powers under G.S. 143-151.17.
(b) A certificate issued by the Board under this Article for residential changeout special
inspectors is valid for one year and subject to renewal pursuant to G.S. 143-151.23.
"§ 143-151.16. Certification fees; renewal of certificates; examination fees.
(a) The Board shall establish a schedule of fees to be paid by each applicant for
certification as a qualified Code-enforcement official. Such fee shall not exceed twenty dollars
($20.00) for each applicant.
(b) A certificate, other than a probationary certificate, as a qualified Code-enforcement
official issued pursuant to the provisions of this Article must be renewed annually on or before
the first day of July. Each application for renewal must be accompanied by a renewal fee to be
determined by the Board, but not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00). The Board is authorized to
charge an extra four dollar ($4.00) late renewal fee for renewals made after the first day of July
each year.
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 23

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Any person who fails to renew his the certificate for a period of two consecutive years
may be required by the Board to take and pass the same examination as unlicensed applicants
before allowing such person to renew his the certificate.
(d) The Board may contract with persons for the development and administration of the
examinations required by G.S. 143-151.13(a), for course development related to the
examinations, for review of a particular applicant's examination, and for other related services.
The person with whom the Board contracts may charge applicants a reasonable fee for the costs
associated with the development and administration of the examinations, for course development
related to the examinations, for review of the applicant's examinations, and for other related
services. The fee shall be agreed to by the Board and the other contracting party. The amount of
the fee under this subsection shall not exceed one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175.00).
Contracts for the development and administration of the examinations, for course development
related to the examinations, and for review of examinations shall not be subject to Article 3, 3C,
or 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes or to Article 15 of Chapter 143B of the General
Statutes. However, the Board shall: (i) submit all proposed contracts for supplies, materials,
printing, equipment, and contractual services that exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000)
authorized by this subsection to the Attorney General or the Attorney General's designee for
review as provided in G.S. 114-8.3; and (ii) include in all proposed contracts to be awarded by
the Board under this subsection a standard clause which provides that the State Auditor and
internal auditors of the Board may audit the records of the contractor during and after the term
of the contract to verify accounts and data affecting fees and performance. The Board shall not
award a cost plus percentage of cost agreement or contract for any purpose.
"§ 143-151.17. Grounds for disciplinary actions; investigation; administrative procedures.
(a) The Board has the power to suspend, revoke, demote to a lower level, or refuse to
grant a certificate issued under this Article to any person to whom any of the following applies:
(1) Has been convicted of a felony against this State or the United States, or
convicted of a felony in another state that would also be a felony if it had been
committed in this State.
(2) Has obtained certification through fraud, deceit, or perjury.
(3) Has knowingly aided or abetted any person practicing contrary to the
provisions of this Article or the North Carolina State Building Code or any
building codes adopted by a federally recognized Indian Tribe.
(4) Has defrauded the public or attempted to do so.
(5) Has affixed his or her a signature to a report of inspection or other instrument
of service if no inspection has been made by him or her or under his or her
immediate and responsible direction.made.
(6) Has been guilty of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or gross
incompetence.
(b) The Board may investigate the actions of any qualified Code-enforcement official
certificate holder or applicant upon the verified complaint in writing of any person alleging a
violation of subsection (a) of this section. The Board may suspend, revoke, or demote to a lower
level any certificate of any qualified Code-enforcement official certificate holder and refuse to
grant a certificate to any applicant, whom it finds to have been guilty of one or more of the actions
set out in subsection (a) of this section as grounds for disciplinary action.
(c) A denial, suspension, revocation, or demotion to a lower level of a certificate issued
under this Article shall be made in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
(d) The Board may deny an application for a certificate for any of the grounds that are
described in subsection (a) of this section. Within 30 days after receipt of a notification that an
application for a certificate has been denied, the applicant may make a written request for a
review by a committee designated by the chairman chair of the Board to determine the
reasonableness of the Board's action. The review shall be completed without undue delay, and
Page 24 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the applicant shall be notified promptly in writing as to the outcome of the review. Within 30
days after service of the notification as to the outcome, the applicant may make a written request
for a hearing under Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes if the applicant disagrees
with the outcome.
(e) This section applies to Code-enforcement officials and applicants who are employed
or seek to be employed by a federally recognized Indian Tribe to perform inspections on tribal
lands.
"§ 143-151.18. Violations; penalty; injunction.
On and after July 1, 1979, it It shall be unlawful for any person to represent himself
misrepresent themselves as a qualified Code-enforcement official who does not hold holder of a
currently valid certificate of qualification issued by the Board. Further, it shall be unlawful for
any person to practice Code enforcement except as allowed by any currently valid certificate
issued to that person by the Board. Any person violating any of the provisions of this Article
shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The Board is authorized to apply to any judge of the
superior court for an injunction in order to prevent any violation or threatened violation of the
provisions of this Article.
"§ 143-151.19. Administration.
(a) The Division of Engineering and Building Codes in the Department of Insurance shall
provide clerical and other staff services required by the Board, and shall administer and enforce
all provisions of this Article and all rules promulgated pursuant to this Article, subject to the
direction of the Board, except as delegated by this Article to local units of government, other
State agencies, corporations, or individuals.
(b) The Board shall make copies of this Article and the rules adopted under this Article
available to the public at a price determined by the Board.
(c) The Board shall keep current a record of the names and addresses of all qualified
Code-enforcement officials certificate holders and additional personal data as the Board deems
necessary. The Board annually shall publish a list of all currently certified Code-enforcement
officials.certificate holders.
(d) Each certificate issued by the Board shall contain such identifying information as the
Board requires.
(e) The Board shall issue a duplicate certificate to practice as a qualified
Code-enforcement official a certificate holder in place of one which has been lost, destroyed, or
mutilated upon proper application and payment of a fee to be determined by the Board.
"§ 143-151.20. Donations and appropriations.
(a) In addition to appropriations made by the General Assembly, the Board may accept
for any of its purposes and functions under this Article any and all donations, both real and
personal, and grants of money from any governmental unit or public agency, or from any
institution, person, firm or corporation, and may receive, utilize, disburse and transfer the same,
subject to the approval of the Council of State. Any arrangements pursuant to this section shall
be detailed in the next regular report of the Board. Such report shall include the identity of the
donor, the nature of the transaction, and the conditions, if any. Any moneys received by the Board
pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State treasury to the account of the Board.
(b) The Board may provide grants as a reimbursement for actual expenses incurred by
the State or political subdivision thereof for the provisions of training programs of officials from
other jurisdictions within the State. The Board, by rules, shall provide for the administration of
the grant program authorized herein. In promulgating such rules, the Board shall promote the
most efficient and economical program of Code-enforcement training, including the maximum
utilization of existing facilities and programs for the purpose of avoiding duplication.
"§ 143-151.21. Disposition of fees.
Fees collected by the State Fire Marshal under this Article shall be credited to the Insurance
Regulatory Fund created under G.S. 58-6-25.
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 25

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 143-151.22. North Carolina State Building Code Permit Technician; certification
program; professional development requirements; renewal of certificates; fees;
exam waivers.
(a) State Building Code Permit Technician Certification Program. – The Board shall
develop a North Carolina State Building Code Permit Technician certification program and North
Carolina State Building Code Permit Technician Certificate. To obtain a certificate, a person
must pass an examination, as prescribed by the Board, that is based on the North Carolina State
Building Code, administrative procedures applicable to permit administration, and relevant
topics in support of Code-enforcement officials and local inspection departments. The Board may
issue a certificate to each person who successfully completes the examination. The certificate
shall bear the signatures of the chairman chair and secretary of the Board.
(b) Professional Development Standards for Renewal. – The Board may establish
professional development requirements for North Carolina State Building Code Permit
Technicians as a condition of the renewal of their certificates. The purpose of these professional
development requirements is to assist in maintaining professional competence. A certificate
holder subject to this section shall present evidence to the Board at each certificate renewal after
initial certification that during the 12 months before the certificate expiration date, the certificate
holder has completed the required number of credit hours in courses approved by the Board.
Annual continuing education hour requirements shall be determined by the Board. The Board
may, for good cause shown, grant extensions of time to certificate holders to comply with these
requirements.
(c) Renewal Application. – A North Carolina State Building Code Permit Technician
Certificate must be renewed annually on or before the first day of July.
(d) Fee Authorization. – The Board shall establish a schedule of fees to be paid by each
applicant for initial certification and renewal certification as a North Carolina State Building
Code Permit Technician. A fee of not more than twenty dollars ($20.00), as determined by the
Board, must be paid by any applicant to the Board for the issuance of an initial certification. A
fee of not more than ten dollars ($10.00), as determined by the Board, must be paid by any
applicant to the Board for the issuance of a renewal certification. The Board is authorized to
charge an extra four dollar ($4.00) late renewal fee for renewal applications made after the first
day of July each year.
(e) Qualified Code-Enforcement Official Exam Waiver. – The Board shall, without
requiring an examination, grant a certificate pursuant to this section to any person who, at the
time of application, possesses a Building Inspector standard certificate issued by the Board and
who is in good standing. The Board may assess a fee for a certificate issued pursuant to this
subsection, to the extent authorized by subsection (d) of this section for an initial certification.
(f) Comity. – The Board may, without requiring an examination, grant a certificate
pursuant to this section to any person who, at the time of application, is similarly certified as a
permit technician in good standing by a similar board of another jurisdiction or certified as a
permit technician in good standing by the International Code Council, where standards are
acceptable to the Board. The certificate granted under this subsection shall expire after one year
unless, within that time period, the holder completes a short course, as prescribed by the Board,
based on the North Carolina State Building Code and administrative procedures described in
subsection (a) of this section. The Board may assess a fee for a certificate issued pursuant to this
subsection, to the extent authorized by subsection (d) of this section for an initial certification.
"§ 143-151.23. Disasters and emergencies; temporary certificates.
(a) When a state of emergency, as defined in G.S. 166A-19.3, has been declared by the
Governor due to a natural disaster such as a hurricane, tornado, or flood, or due to a pending
disaster, the Board may issue temporary standard or limited certificates to retired qualified
Code-enforcement officials to conduct Code enforcement in the emergency area, as defined in
G.S. 166A-19.3, for the duration of the state of emergency.
Page 26 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) A temporary standard or limited certificate issued under this section shall expire at
the termination of the state of emergency or 12 months, whichever is earlier. If after 12 months
the state of emergency has not expired, the Board may renew the temporary standard or limited
certificate.
(c) A qualified Code-enforcement official who has been on inactive status and is issued
a temporary standard or limited certificate under this section shall not be subject to the continuing
education requirements established pursuant to G.S. 143-151.13A, unless the individual has been
inactive or retired for over two years and not continuously employed by a city or county
inspection department.
"§ 143-151.24. Residential changeout special inspectors; certification program;
professional development requirements; renewal of certificates; fees; exam
waivers.
(a) Residential Changeout Special Inspector Certification Program. – The Board shall
develop a Residential Changeout Special Inspector Certification Program and residential
changeout special inspector certificate. To obtain a certificate, a person must pass an
examination, as prescribed by the Board, that is based on the North Carolina State Building Code,
administrative procedures applicable to permit administration, and relevant topics related to the
inspection of residential changeout work as described in G.S. 160D-1106.1. The Board may issue
a certificate to each person who successfully applies and completes the examination. The
certificate shall bear the signatures of the chair and secretary of the Board.
(b) Professional Development Standards for Renewal. – The Board may establish
professional development requirements for residential changeout special inspector certificate as
a condition of the renewal of their certificates. The purpose of these professional development
requirements is to assist in maintaining professional competence. A certificate holder subject to
this section shall present evidence to the Board at each certificate renewal after initial certification
that during the 12 months before the certificate expiration date, the certificate holder has
completed the required number of credit hours in courses approved by the Board. Annual
continuing education hour requirements shall be determined by the Board. The Board may, for
good cause shown, grant extensions of time to certificate holders to comply with these
requirements.
(c) Renewal Application. – A residential changeout special inspector certificate must be
renewed annually on or before the first day of July.
(d) Fee Authorization. – The Board shall establish a schedule of fees to be paid by each
applicant for initial certification and renewal certification as a residential changeout special
inspector. A fee of not more than twenty dollars ($20.00), as determined by the Board, must be
paid by any applicant to the Board for the issuance of an initial certification. A fee of not more
than ten dollars ($10.00), as determined by the Board, must be paid by any applicant to the Board
for the issuance of a renewal certification. The Board is authorized to charge an extra four dollar
($4.00) late renewal fee for renewal applications made after the first day of July each year.
(e) Code-Enforcement Official Exam Waiver. – The Board shall, without requiring an
examination, grant a certificate pursuant to this section to any person who, at the time of
application, possesses a Building Inspector standard certificate issued by the Board and who is
in good standing. The Board may assess a fee for a certificate issued pursuant to this subsection
to the extent authorized by subsection (d) of this section for an initial certification.
(f) Certification of Licensed Contractors. – The Board shall issue a standard certificate
to any person who is currently licensed to practice as a plumbing or heating contractor, licensed
pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes, provided the person successfully
completes a short course, as prescribed by the Board, relating to the North Carolina State
Building Code and Code enforcement administration.
(g) Comity. – The Board may, without requiring an examination, grant a certificate
pursuant to this section to any person who, at the time of application, is a similarly certified
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 27

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Building Inspector in good standing by a similar board of another jurisdiction where standards
are acceptable to the Board. The certificate granted under this subsection shall expire after one
year unless, within that time period, the holder completes a short course, as prescribed by the
Board, based on the North Carolina State Building Code and administrative procedures described
in subsection (a) of this section. The Board may assess a fee for a certificate issued pursuant to
this subsection, to the extent authorized by subsection (d) of this section for an initial
certification."
SECTION 4.1.(b) Article 11 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-1106.1. Alternate inspection method by residential changeout special inspectors.
(a) Notwithstanding the building inspection requirements of this Article, a local
government shall accept and approve, without further responsibility to inspect, a residential
changeout inspected by a residential changeout special inspector if all of the following conditions
are met:
(1) The residential changeout is completed by a contractor licensed pursuant to
Article 2 of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes, who is different than the
residential changeout special inspector charged with inspection of that
residential changeout.
(2) The new appliance, and related connections, subject to the residential
changeout meets all of the following conditions:
a. The new appliance requires no alterations to the existing ducting, fuel
type, or piping systems other than what is required for transitioning to
the new appliance.
b. Any venting associated with the new appliance shall be allowed to be
installed, replaced, and repaired where such venting does not pass
through a rated assembly.
c. Any new gas appliance shall be of the same category as the appliance
being replaced, if applicable.
d. The new appliance does not require relocation, excluding minor
adjustments in the same general vicinity.
e. The installation of the new appliance does not require the relocation
or addition to the existing electrical system, except the replacement of
the appliance's branch circuit overcurrent device, or the replacement
of the appliance's branch circuit where such circuit does not pass
through a rated assembly shall be allowed.
f. The electrical branch circuit serving the appliance is single phase.
(3) Field inspection of the installation is performed by a residential changeout
special inspector, certified pursuant to Article 9C of Chapter 143 of the
General Statutes.
(4) The residential changeout special inspector provides the local government
with a signed written certification that work outlined within subdivisions (1)
and (2) of this subsection have been met and is compliant with the North
Carolina State Building Code. The certification required under this
subdivision shall be provided by electronic or physical delivery, and its receipt
shall be promptly acknowledged by the local government through reciprocal
means. The certification shall be made on forms created by the Office of the
State Fire Marshal, in consultation with the North Carolina Residential Code
Council, which shall include the following information:
a. Permit number.
b. Date of inspection.
c. Type of inspection.
Page 28 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. Contractor's name and license number.
e. Street address of the job location.
f. Name, address, telephone number, and certificate number of the
person responsible for the residential changeout special inspection.
(b) In accepting certifications of inspections under subsection (a) of this section, a local
government shall not require information other than what is required within the certification
required under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Upon the acceptance and approval of a signed certification by the local government
as required under subsection (a) of this section, notwithstanding the issuance of a certificate of
compliance, the local government, its inspection department, and its inspectors are discharged
and released from any liabilities, duties, and responsibilities imposed by this Article with respect
to or in common law from any claim arising out of or attributed to the residential changeout
inspection for which the signed written certification was submitted.
(d) For the purposes of this section, the phrase "residential changeout" means work
requiring a building permit for the purpose of heating and air conditioning appliance and water
heater replacement in dwellings subject to the North Carolina Residential Code, and individual
residential units of condominiums and apartments provided the individual appliance serves only
that residential dwelling unit."
SECTION 4.1.(c) By July 1, 2025, the Office of the State Fire Marshal shall develop
an internet-based examination and short course as described in G.S. 143-151.24, as enacted by
subsection (a) of this section, and make it available on the Office's website for the purpose of
certifying residential changeout special inspectors.
SECTION 4.1.(d) By July 1, 2025, the Office of the State Fire Marshal shall develop
the form required under G.S. 160D-1106.1, as enacted by subsection (b) of this section, and make
it available on the Office's website.

PART V. ESTABLISH RIGHT TO REPAIR CONSTRUCTION DEFECTS WITHIN
DWELLINGS SUBJECT TO THE NORTH CAROLINA RESIDENTIAL CODE
SECTION 5.1.(a) Chapter 87 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 9.
"Right to Repair Construction Defects Act.
"§ 87-150. Short title.
This Article shall be known and may be cited as the "Right to Repair Construction Defects
Act."
"§ 87-151. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Action. – Any civil lawsuit, judicial action, or alternative dispute resolution
proceeding for damages or other relief asserting a claim for injury or loss to a
dwelling caused by an alleged construction defect arising out of or related to
the construction, repairing, or remodeling of the dwelling.
(2) Claimant. – An owner who asserts a claim against a general contractor
concerning a construction defect in the construction, repairing, or remodeling
of a dwelling.
(3) Construction defect. – A defect in or a deficiency arising out of the design or
construction of improvements, including the use of defective material,
products, or components.
(4) Dwelling. – A single-family dwelling or other dwelling type subject to the
North Carolina Residential Code, including the systems, components, and
improvements serving that dwelling.
(5) General contractor. – As defined in G.S. 87-1.
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 29

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Serve or service. – Personal service or delivery by certified mail to the last
known address of the addressee.
"§ 87-152. Notice and opportunity to repair.
(a) Notice of Claim. – Before commencing an action against a general contractor
regarding a construction defect, the claimant must, no less than 90 days before filing the action,
serve a written notice of claim on the general contractor. The notice of claim must contain the
following, at a minimum:
(1) A statement that the claimant asserts a construction defect.
(2) A description of the claim or claims in reasonable detail sufficient to
determine the general nature of the construction defect.
(3) A description of any effects of the construction defect, if known.
(b) Request for Clarification. – If a notice of claim is not sufficiently stated, the general
contractor may advise the claimant within 15 days of service of the notice of claim and request
clarification.
(c) General Contractor's Response to Notice of Claim. – The general contractor has 30
days from service of the notice of claim to inspect, offer to remedy, offer to settle with the
claimant, or deny a claim, in whole or in part, regarding the construction defect in writing. The
claimant shall receive written notice of the general contractor's election under this section within
30 days. Failure to respond within 30 days is deemed a denial of the claim.
(d) Response to General Contractor's Offer. – The claimant shall accept a general
contractor's offer, if any, in writing within 10 days of receipt of the offer pursuant to subsection
(c) of this section. Failure to respond within 10 days is deemed a denial of the general contractor's
offer.
(e) Reasonable Access to Dwelling. – If requested, the claimant shall give the general
contractor reasonable access to the dwelling at a mutually agreeable time to inspect a construction
defect and, if agreed to by the parties, repair a construction defect.
(f) Civil Remedy. – Nothing in this Article shall prevent a claimant from proceeding with
a civil action or other remedy provided by law if the parties cannot reach a resolution pursuant
to this Article.
(g) Claimant Repairs. – Nothing in this Article shall be construed to prohibit a claimant
from making immediate repairs to an alleged construction defect subject to this Article to protect
the health and safety of a dwelling's occupants or to mitigate further damage to the dwelling.
(h) Admissibility. – Evidence of offers to settle, repair, or remedy pursuant to this Article
is not admissible to prove liability for or invalidity of the claim or its amount.
"§ 87-153. Filing a complaint with the Board not prohibited.
Nothing in this Article shall prevent a claimant from filing a complaint with the Board in
accordance with G.S. 87-11(a1).
"§ 87-154. Stay of action.
If a claimant files an action in court before first complying with the requirements of this
Article, on motion of a party to the action, the court shall stay the action for 120 days and such
additional time that is necessary for compliance with the requirements of this Article.
"§ 87-155. Statute of limitations and tolling.
Any statute of limitations applicable to a right of action of the claimant under this Article is
tolled until the latter of the following events occur: (i) the claimant denies a general contractor's
offer, in writing, pursuant to G.S. 87-152(d), (ii) the general contractor denies the claimant's
claim, (iii) the repair of the defect is completed, or (iv) either party determines that the general
contractor cannot or will not repair the defect and provides written notice to the other party of
the same."
SECTION 5.1.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
actions commenced on or after that date.

Page 30 House Bill 661-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART VI. MISCELLANEOUS

MODIFY PUBLIC POOL LAWS TO CLARIFY PRIVATE POOL EXCLUSION AND
TO EXEMPT PUBLIC COLD BATHS AND FLOTATION/SENSORY DEPRIVATION
SYSTEMS
SECTION 6.1.(a) G.S. 130A-280, as amended by Section 4.51(a) of S.L. 2024-49,
reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-280. Scope.Scope and definitions.
(a) This Article Part provides for the regulation of public swimming pools in the State as
they may affect the public health and safety. As used in this Article, the term "public swimming
pool" means any structure, chamber, or tank containing an artificial body of water used by the
public for swimming, diving, wading, recreation, or therapy, together with buildings,
appurtenances, and equipment used in connection with the body of water, regardless of whether
a fee is charged for its use. The term includes municipal, school, hotel, motel, apartment,
boarding house, athletic club, or other membership facility pools and spas, spas operating for
display at temporary events, and artificial swimming lagoons. As used in this Article, an
"artificial swimming lagoon" means any body of water used for recreational purposes with more
than 20,000 square feet of surface area, an artificial liner, and a method of disinfectant that results
in a disinfectant residual in the swimming zone that is protective of the public health. This Article
Part does not apply to any of the following:
(1) A private pool serving a single family dwelling and used only by the residents
of the dwelling and their guests.guests regardless of whether their guests gain
use of the private pool through a sharing economy platform or pay a fee for
its use. In all cases in which a fee is exchanged for access to a private pool
serving a single-family dwelling that is used only by the residents of the
dwelling and their guests, the private pool shall be maintained in good and
safe working order.
(2) A private pool serving a single family dwelling meeting the minimum
requirements of this subdivision which is offered to, and used by, individuals
on a temporary basis utilizing a sharing economy platform. For the purposes
of this subdivision, a sharing economy platform means an online platform
used to facilitate peer-to-peer transactions to acquire, provide, or share access
to goods and services. For the purposes of this subdivision, a pool must meet
all of the following minimum requirements:
a. Pools must have proper fencing and barriers to prevent unsupervised
access, especially by children. The fence should be at least 4 feet high
with a self-latching gate.
b. Pools must have clear and conspicuous signage posted around the pool
area specifying pool rules, depth markers, and any potential hazards.
c. Pools must be equipped with basic lifesaving equipment, including life
rings and reaching poles.
d. Pool decks and surrounding areas must have non-slip surfaces.
e. Pools must have properly fitted covers for all submerged suction
outlets.
f. Pools must be well-maintained with proper chemical balance and
cleanliness to ensure safe and healthy swimming conditions.
(2a) A public cold bath that meets all of the following requirements:
a. Is a tub or tank that is used by the general public, one bather at a time,
regardless of whether a fee is charged for its use.
b. Contains chilled water that is (i) maintained at a temperature lower
than 60 degrees Fahrenheit, (ii) no more than 180 gallons in volume,
House Bill 661-Second Edition Page 31

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and (iii) at a depth that allows the bather to maintain the bather's head
above the water while in a seated position.
c. Continuously filters and sanitizes the chilled water.
(3) Therapeutic pools used in physical therapy programs operated by medical
facilities licensed by the Department or operated by a licensed physical
therapist, nor to therapeutic chambers drained, cleaned, and refilled after each
individual use.
(4) Floatation or sensory deprivation systems certified by the National Sanitation
Foundation to meet the most current version of Standard 50 of the National
Sanitation Foundation/American National Standards Institute.
(b) The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Artificial swimming lagoon. – Any body of water used for recreational
purposes with more than 20,000 square feet of surface area, an artificial liner,
and a method of disinfectant that results in a disinfectant residual in the
swimming zone that is protective of the public health.
(2) Public swimming pool. – Any structure, chamber, or tank containing an
artificial body of water used by the public for swimming, diving, wading,
recreation, or therapy, together with buildings, appurtenances, and equipment
used in connection with the body of water, regardless of whether a fee is
charged for its use. The term includes municipal, school, hotel, motel,
apartment, boarding house, athletic club, or other membership facility pools
and spas, spas operating for display at temporary events, and artificial
swimming lagoons.
(3) Sharing economy platform. – An online platform used to facilitate
peer-to-peer transactions to acquire, provide, or share access to goods and
services."
SECTION 6.1.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART VII. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE AND EFFECTIVE DATE

SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 7.1. If any section or provision of this act is declared unconstitutional or
invalid by the courts, it does not affect the validity of this act as a whole or any part other than
the part declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 7.2. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 32 House Bill 661-Second Edition